Connecticut, session 2026, SB00181.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That $330,811,954 be transferred from the Budget Reserve Fund to the
General Fund and said amount be used to provide refunds, as calculated
by the Department of Revenue Services, of personal income tax actually
paid by taxpayers who filed a federal income tax return for the taxable
year commencing on or after January 1, 2025.